Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-506
Record; contents; duty of county treasurer.

The treasurer of said county shall record in a book kept for that purpose a statement of all the bonds issued, giving the number, amount, date, and to whom issued; and shall also keep and record in said book a statement of all the bonds, warrants, orders, certificates and audited accounts so taken, giving their number, date, amount of principal and interest, if any, to whom issued, by whom presented for redemption, and as often as he may be called upon by the said board so to do, he shall present a statement thereof, and of all his doings in the premises, to the said county board.

Laws 1879, § 137, p. 389;

Laws 1883, c. 28, § 1, p. 193;

R.S.1913, § 421;

C.S.1922, § 338;

C.S.1929, § 11-506;

R.S.1943, § 10-506.